Maryland, session 2025, HB1294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
12–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Borrower” means a person who borrows money under this subtitle.
(c) “Commercial loan” means a loan which is made:
(1) Solely to acquire or carry on a business or commercial enterprise; or
(2) To any business or commercial organization.
– 1 –

Ch. 847 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) “Effective rate of simple interest” means the yield to maturity rate of interest
received or to be received by a lender on the face amount of a loan, computed in accordance
with § 12–107 of this subtitle.
(e) “Interest” means, except as specifically provided in § 12–105 of this subtitle
OR § 12–1501 OF THIS TITLE, any compensation directly or indirectly imposed by a lender
for the extension of credit for the use or forbearance of money, including any loan fee,
origination fee, service and carrying charge, investigator’s fee, time–price differential, and
any amount payable as a discount or point or otherwise payable for services.
(f) “Lender” means a licensee or a person who makes a loan subject to this
subtitle.
(g) “Licensee” means a person that is required to be licensed to make loans subject
to this subtitle, regardless of whether the person is actually licensed.
(h) (1) “Loan” means a loan or an advance of money or credit subject to this
subtitle, regardless of whether the loan or advance of money or credit is or purports to be
made under this subtitle.
(2) “Loan” does not include:
(i) A loan or advance of money or credit subject to Subtitle 3 of this
title, unless a written election is made under § 12–101.1 of this subtitle;
(ii) A plan or loan for which a written election is made under Subtitle
3, Subtitle 4, Subtitle 9, or Subtitle 10 of this title; or
(iii) An installment sale agreement as defined in § 12–601 of this
title.
[(h–1)] (I) “Mobile home” has the meaning stated in § 11–501 of the Financial
Institutions Article.
[(i)] (J) “Person” includes an individual, corporation, business trust, statutory
trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, two or more persons having a joint or common
interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.
[(j)] (K) “Point” means a fee, premium, bonus, loan origination fee, service
charge, or any other charge equal to 1 percent of the principal amount of a loan which is
charged by the lender at or before the time the loan is made as additional compensation for
the loan.
[(k)] (L) “Simple interest” means interest charged on the principal amount
loaned to the borrower.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 847
[(l)] (M) “Stated rate of interest” means the annual rate of interest stated in
percentage which appears on the face of the bond, draft, mortgage, deed of trust, security
agreement, promissory note, or other instrument which evidences the indebtedness.
(N) (1) “TIP” MEANS A VOLUNTARY PAYMENT BY A CONSUMER TO A
LENDER OR THIRD PARTY WHO PROVIDES OR ARRANGES A LOAN:
(I) MADE AT THE TIME OF THE TRANSACTION IN RECOGNITION
OF THE LENDER’S OR THIRD PARTY’S PROVISION OR ARRANGEMENT OF THE LOAN;
(II) MADE AT THE SOLE DISCRETION OF THE CONSUMER; AND
(III) THAT DOES NOT AFFECT THE WILLINGNESS OF THE LENDER
OR THIRD PARTY TO PROVIDE OR ARRANGE THE LOAN OR ANY FUTURE LOAN OR
AFFECT THE TERMS OF ANY LOAN.
(2) “TIP” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY PAYMENT MADE BY A CONSUMER
FOR EXPEDITED PROCESSING OR DISBURSEMENT OR FOR A MEMBERSHIP,
REGISTRATION, OR SUBSCRIPTION FEE.
[(m)] (O) “Usury” means the charging of interest by a lender in an amount which
is greater than that allowed by this subtitle.
[(n)] (P) “Wages” means all remuneration paid to any employee for the
employee’s employment, including the cash value of all remuneration paid in any medium
other than cash.
12–128.
(A) A LENDER WHO GIVES CONSUMERS AN OPTION TO PROVIDE THE
LENDER A TIP SHALL:
(1) DISCLOSE TO THE CONSUMER TO WHOM THE TIP WILL BE
ALLOCATED; AND
(2) SET THE DEFAULT TIP AT ZERO.
(B) A LENDER MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY SUGGEST THAT
PROVIDING A TIP WILL INFLUENCE:
(1) THE LENDER’S WILLINGNESS TO PROVIDE A LOAN TO A
CONSUMER AT ANY TIME; OR
– 3 –

Ch. 847 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE TERMS OF ANY LOAN OFFERED TO THE CONSUMER BY THAT
LENDER.
(C) A LENDER WHO RECEIVES A TIP THAT WOULD OTHERWISE CREATE A
RATE OF INTEREST ABOVE THAT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE
FOUND IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE LENDER RETURNS ALL OF THE TIP
OR THAT PORTION OF THE TIP NECESSARY TO REDUCE THE RATE OF INTEREST TO
AN AMOUNT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN 30 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING THE TIP.
(D) A LENDER SHALL PROMINENTLY DISCLOSE THAT:
(1) PROVIDING A TIP DOES NOT INFLUENCE THE LENDER’S
WILLINGNESS TO PROVIDE A LOAN TO THE CONSUMER AT ANY TIME; AND
(2) ANY TIP PAID BY THE CONSUMER DOES NOT INURE TO THE DIRECT
BENEFIT OF ANY SPECIFIC EMPLOYEE OF THE LENDER OR ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL.
12–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Regulation.
(C) “INTEREST” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS TITLE.
[(c)] (D) “Lender” means a licensee or a person who makes a loan subject to this
subtitle.
[(d)] (E) “Licensee” means a person who is required to be licensed under Title
11, Subtitle 2 of the Financial Institutions Article, the Maryland Consumer Loan Law
– Licensing Provisions, regardless of whether the person is actually licensed.
[(e)] (F) (1) “Loan” means any loan or advance of money or credit subject to
this subtitle, regardless of whether the loan or advance of money or credit is or purports to
be made under this subtitle.
(2) “Loan” does not include an installment sale agreement as defined in §
12–601 of this title.
[(f)] (G) “Person” includes an individual, corporation, business trust, statutory
trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, two or more persons having a joint or common
interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 847
(H) “TIP” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS TITLE.
[(g)] (I) “Wages” means all remuneration paid to any employee for the
employee’s employment, including the cash value of all remuneration paid in any medium
other than cash.
12–318.
(A) A LENDER WHO GIVES CONSUMERS AN OPTION TO PROVIDE THE
LENDER A TIP SHALL:
(1) DISCLOSE TO THE CONSUMER TO WHOM THE TIP WILL BE
ALLOCATED; AND
(2) SET THE DEFAULT TIP AT ZERO.
(B) A LENDER MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY SUGGEST THAT
PROVIDING A TIP WILL INFLUENCE:
(1) THE LENDER’S WILLINGNESS TO PROVIDE A LOAN TO A
CONSUMER AT ANY TIME; OR
(2) THE TERMS OF ANY LOAN OFFERED TO THE CONSUMER BY THAT
LENDER.
(C) A LENDER WHO RECEIVES A TIP THAT WOULD OTHERWISE CREATE A
RATE OF INTEREST ABOVE THAT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE
FOUND IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE LENDER RETURNS ALL OF THE TIP
OR THAT PORTION OF THE TIP NECESSARY TO REDUCE THE RATE OF INTEREST TO
AN AMOUNT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN 30 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING THE TIP.
(D) A LENDER SHALL PROMINENTLY DISCLOSE THAT:
(1) PROVIDING A TIP DOES NOT INFLUENCE THE LENDER’S
WILLINGNESS TO PROVIDE A LOAN TO THE CONSUMER AT ANY TIME; AND
(2) ANY TIP PAID BY THE CONSUMER DOES NOT INURE TO THE DIRECT
BENEFIT OF ANY SPECIFIC EMPLOYEE OF THE LENDER OR ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL.
12–319.
– 5 –

Ch. 847 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS TITLE, A LOAN SHALL BE
SUBJECT TO THIS SUBTITLE, WHETHER OR NOT ELECTED, IF THE LOAN IS
CONSUMER–DIRECTED EARNED WAGE ACCESS UNDER SUBTITLE 15 OF THIS TITLE.
12–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Borrower” means a corporation, partnership, association, government or
governmental subdivision or agency, trust, individual, or other entity receiving a loan or
other extension of credit under this subtitle.
(c) “Commercial loan” and “extension of credit for a commercial purpose” mean
an extension of credit made:
(1) Solely to acquire an interest in or to carry on a business or commercial
enterprise; or
(2) To any business or commercial organization.
(d) “Consumer borrower” means an individual receiving a loan or other extension
of credit under this subtitle for personal, household, or family purposes or an individual
receiving a commercial loan or other extension of credit for any commercial purpose not in
excess of $75,000, secured by residential real property.
(e) “Credit device” means any card, plate, check, draft, identification code, or
other means of identification contemplated by the agreement governing the plan.
(f) (1) “Credit grantor” means any individual, corporation, business trust,
statutory trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, two or more persons having a joint
or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity making a loan or other
extension of credit under this subtitle which is incorporated, chartered, or licensed
pursuant to State or federal law, the lending operations of which are subject to supervision,
examination, and regulation by a State or federal agency or which is licensed under Title
12, Subtitle 4 of the Financial Institutions Article or is a retailer.
(2) “Credit grantor” includes:
(i) Any bank, trust company, depository institution, or savings bank
having a branch in this State;
(ii) Any subsidiary of a bank holding company, as defined in the
federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended, which is domiciled, doing
business, and offering a revolving credit plan involving the issuance of credit devices in this
State; and
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 847
(iii) Any person who acquires or obtains the assignment of a revolving
credit plan made under this subtitle.
(G) “INTEREST” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS TITLE.
[(g)] (H) (1) “Loan” means a cash advance to be paid to or for the account of
the borrower.
(2) “Loan” includes an advance made in accordance with the terms of a
shared appreciation agreement.
[(h)] (I) “Mobile home” has the meaning stated in § 11–501 of the Financial
Institutions Article.
[(i)] (J) “Nonconsumer borrower” means any borrower other than a consumer
borrower.
[(j)] (K) (1) “Outstanding unpaid indebtedness” means on any day the total
amount of purchases and loans charged to the borrower’s account under the plan which is
outstanding and unpaid at the end of the day, after adding the aggregate amount of any
new purchases and loans charged to the account that day and deducting the aggregate
amount of any payments and credits applied to the account that day.
(2) If the agreement governing the plan permits, “outstanding unpaid
indebtedness” may include the amount of any interest, finance charges, and additional
charges, including late or delinquency charges, that have accrued in the account and are
unpaid at the end of the day.
[(k)] (L) “Purchase” means an extension of credit for a purchase of real or
personal, tangible or intangible property, or an extension of credit for services, licenses,
taxes, official fees, fines, private or governmental obligations, or any other thing of value,
including a charitable contribution.
[(l)] (M) “Residential real property” means owner–occupied real property having
a dwelling on it designated principally as a residence with accommodations for not more
than four families.
[(m)] (N) “Revolving credit plan” or “plan” means a plan that contemplates the
extension of credit under an account governed by an agreement between a credit grantor
and a borrower under which:
(1) The credit grantor permits the borrower and, if the agreement
governing the plan permits, persons acting on behalf of or with authorization from the
borrower to make purchases or obtain loans from time to time;
– 7 –

Ch. 847 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The amounts of purchases and loans are charged to the borrower’s
account;
(3) The borrower is required to pay the credit grantor the amounts of all
purchases and loans charged to the borrower’s account under the plan but has the privilege
of paying amounts due from time to time as agreed; and
(4) Interest or finance charges may be charged and collected by the credit
grantor from time to time on the amounts due under the plan.
[(n)] (O) “Shared appreciation agreement” has the meaning stated in § 11–501
of the Financial Institutions Article.
(P) “TIP” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS TITLE.
12–927.
(A) A LENDER WHO GIVES CONSUMERS AN OPTION TO PROVIDE THE
LENDER A TIP SHALL:
(1) DISCLOSE TO THE CONSUMER TO WHOM THE TIP WILL BE
ALLOCATED; AND
(2) SET THE DEFAULT TIP AT ZERO.
(B) A LENDER MAY NOT SUGGEST THAT PROVIDING A TIP WILL INFLUENCE:
(1) THE LENDER’S WILLINGNESS TO PROVIDE A LOAN TO A
CONSUMER AT ANY TIME; OR
(2) THE TERMS OF ANY EARNED WAGE ACCESS OFFERED TO THE
CONSUMER BY THAT LENDER.
(C) A LENDER WHO RECEIVES A TIP THAT WOULD OTHERWISE CREATE A
RATE OF INTEREST ABOVE THAT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE
FOUND IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE LENDER RETURNS ALL OF THE TIP
OR THAT PORTION OF THE TIP NECESSARY TO REDUCE THE RATE OF INTEREST TO
AN AMOUNT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN 30 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING THE TIP.
(D) A LENDER SHALL PROMINENTLY DISCLOSE THAT:
(1) PROVIDING A TIP DOES NOT INFLUENCE THE LENDER’S
WILLINGNESS TO PROVIDE A LOAN TO THE CONSUMER AT ANY TIME; AND
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 847
(2) ANY TIP PAID BY THE CONSUMER DOES NOT INURE TO THE DIRECT
BENEFIT OF ANY SPECIFIC EMPLOYEE OF THE LENDER OR ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL.
12–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Balloon payment” means any scheduled payment on an installment
loan that is more than 2 times the average of all other payments scheduled to repay the
installment loan.
(2) “Balloon payment” does not include a down payment.
(c) “Borrower” means a corporation, partnership, association, government, or
governmental subdivision or agency, trust, individual, or other entity receiving a loan or
other extension of credit under this subtitle.
(d) “Closed end credit” means the extension of credit by a credit grantor to a
borrower under an arrangement or agreement which is not a revolving credit plan as
defined in Subtitle 9 of this title.
(e) “Commercial loan” and “extension of credit for a commercial purpose” mean
an extension of credit made:
(1) Solely to acquire an interest in or to carry on a business or commercial
enterprise; or
(2) To any business or commercial organization.
(f) “Consumer borrower” means an individual receiving a loan or other extension
of credit under this subtitle for personal, household, or family purposes or an individual
receiving a commercial loan or other extension of credit for any commercial purpose not in
excess of $75,000, secured by residential real property.
(g) (1) “Credit grantor” means any individual, corporation, business trust,
statutory trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, two or more persons having a joint
or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity making a loan or other
extension of credit under this subtitle which is incorporated, chartered, or licensed
pursuant to State or federal law, the lending operations of which are subject to supervision,
examination, and regulation by a State or federal agency or which is licensed under Title
12, Subtitle 4 of the Financial Institutions Article or is a retailer.
(2) “Credit grantor” includes:
– 9 –

Ch. 847 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Any bank, trust company, depository institution, or savings bank
having a branch in this State;
(ii) A person not required to be licensed under this subtitle, who is
exempt from the licensing provisions of Title 11, Subtitle 5 of the Financial Institutions
Article, who makes a loan or extension of credit under this subtitle secured by a secondary
mortgage on residential real property; and
(iii) Any person who acquires or obtains the assignment of an
agreement for an extension of credit made under this subtitle.
(h) “Debt cancellation agreement” means an agreement between a credit grantor
and a borrower which provides for cancellation of the remaining loan balance in the event
of theft or total destruction of the collateral for the loan minus the proceeds of any insurance
maintained on the collateral for the loan or, if the borrower does not have insurance, the
actual cash value of the collateral at the time of loss, determined as provided in the
agreement.
(i) “Installment loan” means a loan repayable in scheduled periodic payments of
principal and interest.
(J) “INTEREST” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS TITLE.
[(j)] (K) (1) “Loan” means any single extension of closed end credit, whether
repayable in installments, on demand, or otherwise and whether extended in one or more
advances.
(2) “Loan” includes an advance made in accordance with the terms of a
shared appreciation agreement.
[(k)] (L) “Mechanical repair contract” has the meaning stated in Title 15,
Subtitle 3 of the Transportation Article.
[(l)] (M) “Mobile home” has the meaning stated in § 11–501 of the Financial
Institutions Article.
[(m)] (N) “Remaining loan balance”, when used in reference to a debt cancellation
agreement, does not include:
(1) Any delinquent or deferred payments;
(2) Past due charges;
(3) Late payment charges;
(4) Unearned interest;
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 847
(5) Unearned rental payments;
(6) The portion of any financed taxes or charges, including charges for
credit life insurance, credit health insurance, credit involuntary unemployment benefit
insurance, and mechanical repair contracts, actually refunded to the borrower or credited
as a reduction to the loan balance; or
(7) By agreement of the parties, the amount of any primary insurance
deductible.
[(n)] (O) “Residential real property” means owner–occupied real property having
a dwelling on it designated principally as a residence with accommodations for not more
than four families.
[(o)] (P) “Shared appreciation agreement” has the meaning stated in § 11–501
of the Financial Institutions Article.
(Q) “TIP” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS TITLE.
12–1031.
(A) A LENDER WHO GIVES CONSUMERS AN OPTION TO PROVIDE THE
LENDER A TIP SHALL:
(1) DISCLOSE TO THE CONSUMER TO WHOM THE TIP WILL BE
ALLOCATED; AND
(2) SET THE DEFAULT TIP AT ZERO.
(B) A LENDER MAY NOT SUGGEST THAT PROVIDING A TIP WILL INFLUENCE:
(1) THE LENDER’S WILLINGNESS TO PROVIDE A LOAN TO A
CONSUMER AT ANY TIME; OR
(2) THE TERMS OF ANY LOAN OFFERED TO THE CONSUMER BY THAT
LENDER.
(C) A LENDER WHO RECEIVES A TIP THAT WOULD OTHERWISE CREATE A
RATE OF INTEREST ABOVE THAT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE
FOUND IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE LENDER RETURNS ALL OF THE TIP
OR THAT PORTION OF THE TIP NECESSARY TO REDUCE THE RATE OF INTEREST TO
AN AMOUNT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN 30 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING THE TIP.
– 11 –

Ch. 847 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) A LENDER SHALL PROMINENTLY DISCLOSE THAT:
(1) PROVIDING A TIP DOES NOT INFLUENCE THE LENDER’S
WILLINGNESS TO PROVIDE A LOAN TO THE CONSUMER AT ANY TIME; AND
(2) ANY TIP PAID BY THE CONSUMER DOES NOT INURE TO THE DIRECT
BENEFIT OF ANY SPECIFIC EMPLOYEE OF THE LENDER OR ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL.
SUBTITLE 15. EARNED WAGE ACCESS.
12–1501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING TERMS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BANK” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–201 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) “CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
14–1201 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) “CONSUMER–DIRECTED EARNED WAGE ACCESS” MEANS DELIVERY TO A
CONSUMER OF ACCESS TO UNPAID BUT EARNED WAGES:
(1) THAT IS PROVIDED TO A CONSUMER BY A THIRD PARTY WHO DOES
NOT HAVE A RELATIONSHIP WITH THE CONSUMER’S EMPLOYER;
(2) THAT IS BASED ON EMPLOYMENT, INCOME, OR ATTENDANCE
DATA OBTAINED DIRECTLY FROM THE CONSUMER; AND
(3) WHERE THE CONSUMER DOES NOT PAY THE PROVIDER INTEREST.
(E) “EARNED WAGE” MEANS SALARY, WAGES, COMPENSATION, OR OTHER
INCOME EARNED:
(1) ON AN HOURLY, PROJECT–BASED, PIECEWORK, OR OTHER BASIS;
OR
(2) THROUGH SERVICES RENDERED AS AN INDEPENDENT
CONTRACTOR.
(F) “EARNED WAGE ACCESS” MEANS:
(1) CONSUMER–DIRECTED EARNED WAGE ACCESS; OR
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 847
(2) EMPLOYER–INTEGRATED EARNED WAGE ACCESS.
(G) “EMPLOYER–INTEGRATED EARNED WAGE ACCESS” MEANS DELIVERY
OF UNPAID BUT EARNED WAGES:
(1) THAT ARE PROVIDED TO A CONSUMER DIRECTLY BY A PERSON
THE EMPLOYER HAS CONTRACTED TO PROVIDE THE SERVICE;
(2) THAT ARE DETERMINED BASED ON EMPLOYMENT, INCOME, OR
ATTENDANCE DATA OBTAINED DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY FROM THE CONSUMER’S
EMPLOYER, INCLUDING A PAYROLL SERVICE PROVIDER; AND
(3) WHERE THE CONSUMER DOES NOT PAY THE PROVIDER INTEREST.
(H) (1) “FEE” MEANS:
(I) A FEE IMPOSED BY A PROVIDER FOR DELIVERY OR
EXPEDITED DELIVERY OF EARNED WAGE ACCESS TO A CONSUMER; OR
(II) A SUBSCRIPTION OR MEMBERSHIP FEE IMPOSED BY A
PROVIDER FOR A GROUP OF SERVICES THAT INCLUDES EARNED WAGE ACCESS.
(2) “FEE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A VOLUNTARY TIP, GRATUITY, OR
OTHER DONATION.
(I) (1) “INTEREST” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS
TITLE.
(2) “INTEREST” DOES NOT INCLUDE A FEE IMPOSED BY AN EARNED
WAGE ACCESS PROVIDER LICENSED UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE
FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE.
(J) (1) “LOAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) “LOAN” INCLUDES EARNED WAGE ACCESS, SUBJECT TO THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(K) “PAYROLL PERIOD” MEANS A PERIOD OF TIME DURING WHICH A
CONSUMER EARNS WAGES THAT AN EMPLOYER OWES TO THE EMPLOYEE AT THE END
OF THE PERIOD.
(L) “PROCEEDS” MEANS A PAYMENT TO A CONSUMER BY A PROVIDER THAT
IS BASED ON UNPAID BUT EARNED WAGES.
– 13 –

Ch. 847 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(M) (1) “PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON WHO PROVIDES TO CONSUMERS
EITHER CONSUMER–DIRECTED EARNED WAGE ACCESS OR EMPLOYER–INTEGRATED
EARNED WAGE ACCESS.
(2) “PROVIDER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A SERVICE PROVIDER, SUCH AS A PAYROLL SERVICE
PROVIDER, THAT MAY VERIFY THE AVAILABLE EARNINGS OF A CONSUMER BUT THAT
IS NOT CONTRACTUALLY OBLIGATED TO FUND ANY PROCEEDS DELIVERED AS PART
OF AN EARNED WAGE ACCESS SERVICE; OR
(II) AN EMPLOYER THAT OFFERS A PORTION OF SALARY,
WAGES, OR OTHER COMPENSATION DIRECTLY TO ITS EMPLOYEES OR INDEPENDENT
CONTRACTORS BEFORE A NORMALLY SCHEDULED PAY DATE FOR A PAYROLL
PERIOD.
(N) “TIP” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS TITLE.
(O) “WAGES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS TITLE.
12–1502.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT ENGAGE IN THE BUSINESS OF PROVIDING
EARNED WAGE ACCESS UNLESS THE PERSON IS LICENSED UNDER OR IS EXEMPT
FROM THE LICENSING REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE.
(B) FAILURE TO OBTAIN A CONSUMER LOAN LICENSE SHALL SUBJECT A
PROVIDER TO THE ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS OF TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE
FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE.
(C) AN EARNED WAGE ACCESS PROVIDER LICENSED UNDER TITLE 11,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE AND SUBJECT TO THIS
SUBTITLE IS EXEMPT FROM OTHER PROVISIONS OF STATE LAW GOVERNING
LENDING, CREDIT, OR DEBT, INCLUDING THE PROVISIONS OF SUBTITLE 1,
SUBTITLE 3, SUBTITLE 9, AND SUBTITLE 10 OF THIS TITLE.
(D) EARNED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED:
(1) A MONEY TRANSMISSION; OR
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 847
(2) A VIOLATION OF OR NONCOMPLIANCE WITH STATE LAWS
GOVERNING DEDUCTIONS FROM PAYROLL, SALARY, WAGES, COMPENSATION, OR
OTHER INCOME OR THE PURCHASE, SALE, ASSIGNMENT, OR ORDER FOR UNPAID BUT
EARNED WAGES.
12–1503.
(A) A PROVIDER OF EARNED WAGE ACCESS SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO
RESPOND TO QUESTIONS RAISED BY CONSUMERS;
(2) ADDRESS COMPLAINTS FROM CONSUMERS IN AN EXPEDIENT
MANNER;
(3) WHENEVER THE PROVIDER OFFERS A CONSUMER THE OPTION TO
RECEIVE EARNED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES FOR A FEE OR SOLICITS AN OPTIONAL
TIP, GRATUITY, OR OTHER DONATION, OFFER TO THE CONSUMER AT LEAST ONE
REASONABLE OPTION TO OBTAIN EARNED WAGE ACCESS AT NO COST TO THE
CONSUMER;
(4) CLEARLY EXPLAIN TO A CONSUMER HOW TO ELECT A NO–COST
OPTION DESCRIBED IN ITEM (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(5) BEFORE ENTERING INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH A CONSUMER FOR
THE PROVISION OF EARNED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES:
(I) INFORM THE CONSUMER OF THE CONSUMER’S RIGHTS
UNDER THE AGREEMENT; AND
(II) FULLY AND CLEARLY DISCLOSE ALL FEES ASSOCIATED
WITH THE EARNED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES;
(6) INFORM A CONSUMER OF ANY MATERIAL CHANGES TO THE TERMS
AND CONDITIONS OF THE EARNED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES BEFORE IMPLEMENTING
THOSE CHANGES FOR THAT CONSUMER;
(7) ALLOW A CONSUMER TO CANCEL USE OF THE PROVIDER’S
EARNED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES AT ANY TIME WITHOUT INCURRING A
CANCELLATION FEE IMPOSED BY THE PROVIDER;
(8) COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE LOCAL, STATE, AND FEDERAL
PRIVACY AND INFORMATION SECURITY LAWS;
– 15 –

Ch. 847 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(9) IF A PROVIDER SOLICITS, CHARGES, OR RECEIVES A TIP,
GRATUITY, OR OTHER DONATION FROM A CONSUMER:
(I) SET THE DEFAULT TIP, IF ANY, AT ZERO;
(II) CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSE TO THE
CONSUMER IMMEDIATELY PRIOR TO EACH TRANSACTION THAT ANY TIP PAID BY THE
CONSUMER DOES NOT INURE TO THE DIRECT BENEFIT OF ANY SPECIFIC EMPLOYEE
OF THE PROVIDER OR ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL;
(III) CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSE TO THE
CONSUMER IMMEDIATELY PRIOR TO EACH TRANSACTION THAT A TIP, GRATUITY, OR
OTHER DONATION AMOUNT IS OPTIONAL AND VOLUNTARY; AND
(IV) CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSE IN THE
PROVIDER’S SERVICE CONTRACT WITH THE CONSUMER THAT:
1. TIPS, GRATUITIES, OR OTHER DONATIONS ARE
VOLUNTARY; AND
2. THE OFFERING OF EARNED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES,
INCLUDING THE AMOUNT OF PROCEEDS A CONSUMER IS ELIGIBLE TO REQUEST AND
THE FREQUENCY WITH WHICH PROCEEDS ARE PROVIDED TO A CONSUMER, IS NOT
CONTINGENT ON WHETHER THE CONSUMER PAYS ANY TIP, GRATUITY, OR OTHER
DONATION OR ON THE SIZE OF THE TIP, GRATUITY, OR OTHER DONATION;
(10) PROVIDE PROCEEDS TO A CONSUMER BY ANY MEANS MUTUALLY
AGREED UPON BY THE CONSUMER AND THE PROVIDER; AND
(11) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IF
THE PROVIDER WILL SEEK REPAYMENT OF OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS OR PAYMENT
OF FEES OR OTHER AMOUNTS OWED OR INCURRED, INCLUDING VOLUNTARY TIPS,
GRATUITIES, OR OTHER DONATIONS, FROM A CONSUMER’S ACCOUNT AT A BANK IN
CONNECTION WITH EARNED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES COVERED BY THIS SUBTITLE,
INCLUDING BY MEANS OF ELECTRIC FUND TRANSFER:
(I) COMPLY WITH THE FEDERAL ELECTRONIC FUND
TRANSFER ACT AND REGULATIONS ADOPTED TO IMPLEMENT THE ACT; AND
(II) REIMBURSE THE CONSUMER WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS FOR
THE FULL AMOUNT OF ANY OVERDRAFT OR NONSUFFICIENT FUND FEES IMPOSED
ON A CONSUMER BY THE CONSUMER’S BANK THAT WERE CAUSED BY THE PROVIDER
ATTEMPTING TO SEEK REPAYMENT OF ANY OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS OR PAYMENT
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 847
OF FEES, TIPS, GRATUITIES, OR OTHER DONATIONS IN CONNECTION WITH EARNED
WAGE ACCESS SERVICES COVERED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) SUBSECTION (A)(11) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PROVIDER
SEEKING REPAYMENT OF OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS OR PAYMENT OF FEES OR
OTHER AMOUNTS OWED THAT WERE RECEIVED OR INCURRED BY A CONSUMER
THROUGH FRAUDULENT OR OTHER UNLAWFUL MEANS.
12–1504.
A PROVIDER OF EARNED WAGE ACCESS MAY NOT:
(1) SHARE WITH AN EMPLOYER ANY FEES, TIPS, OR OTHER CHARGES
RECEIVED FROM A CONSUMER FOR EARNED WAGE ACCESS;
(2) CONDITION A CONSUMER’S ABILITY TO OBTAIN EARNED WAGE
ACCESS ON THE CONSUMER’S ABILITY OR WILLINGNESS TO PAY THE PROVIDER A
TIP;
(3) CHARGE A CONSUMER A LATE FEE, INTEREST, OR OTHER
PENALTY FOR FAILURE TO PAY ANY PROCEEDS, FEES, OR TIPS;
(4) REPORT ANY INFORMATION ABOUT A CONSUMER’S FAILURE TO
PAY ANY PROCEEDS, FEES, OR TIPS TO ANY CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY;
(5) OBTAIN A CONSUMER’S CREDIT REPORT AS A METHOD OF
QUALIFYING THE CONSUMER FOR EARNED WAGE ACCESS;
(6) RECEIVE INTEREST FROM A CONSUMER; OR
(7) COMPEL OR ATTEMPT TO COMPEL PAYMENT BY A CONSUMER OF
ANY PROCEEDS, FEES, TIPS, GRATUITIES, OR OTHER DONATIONS THROUGH:
(I) A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST THE CONSUMER;
(II) THE USE OF A THIRD PARTY TO PURSUE COLLECTION FROM
THE CONSUMER ON THE PROVIDER’S BEHALF; OR
(III) THE SALE OR ASSIGNMENT OF OUTSTANDING AMOUNTS TO
A THIRD–PARTY COLLECTOR OR DEBT BUYER FOR COLLECTION FROM THE
CONSUMER.
12–1505.
– 17 –

Ch. 847 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A PROVIDER OF EARNED WAGE ACCESS MAY CHARGE A FEE FOR DELIVERY OR
EXPEDITED DELIVERY OF EARNED WAGE ACCESS TO A CONSUMER NOT EXCEEDING:
(1) $5.00 FOR ANY ADVANCE OF PROCEEDS EQUAL TO OR LESS THAN
$75.00; OR
(2) $7.50 FOR ANY ADVANCE OF PROCEEDS GREATER THAN $75.00.
12–1506.
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, A PROVIDER OF
EARNED WAGE ACCESS SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
REGULATION THAT INCLUDES ANY INFORMATION CONSIDERED NECESSARY BY THE
COMMISSIONER, AS PRESCRIBED BY REGULATION, TO ASSESS THE SIZE AND STATUS
OF THE EARNED WAGE ACCESS MARKET IN THE STATE.
12–1507.
THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Enacted under Article II, § 17(c) of the Maryland Constitution, May 25, 2025.
– 18 –